Arkansas, session 2025, HB1292.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 9-9-213 is amended to read as follows:
9-9-213. Required residence of minor.
(a)(1) A In an adoption where the child is not in the custody of the
Department of Human Services, a final decree of adoption shall not be issued
and an interlocutory decree of adoption does not become final until the minor
to be adopted, other than a stepchild of the petitioner, has lived in the
home for at least six (6) months after:
(A) placement Placement by an a child placement agency
licensed under the Child Welfare Agency Licensing Act, § 9-28-401 et seq.; or
(B) for at least six (6) months after the The petition for
adoption is filed.
(2) This subsection does not apply if the minor to be adopted
is:
(A) The stepchild of the petitioner; or
(B) Less than six (6) months of age at the time the
petition was filed.
(b) In an adoption where the child is in the custody of the
department, a final decree of adoption shall not be issued and an
*LJH058*
02-13-2025 10:34:48 LJH058

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 H2/13/25 HB1292
interlocutory decree of adoption does not become final until the minor to be
adopted has lived in the home for at least six (6) months unless:
(1) Residence in the home is not required for a The minor to be
adopted if the minor is in the custody of the Department of Human Services,
and the minor must reside outside of the home to receive medically necessary
health care;
(2) The minor to be adopted is less than six (6) months of age;
or
(3) The Director of the Division of Children and Family Services
waives the residency requirement for a minor to be adopted when the minor is
sixteen (16) years of age or older and is participating in a life skills,
technical, or vocational program.
(c) This section does not apply to a minor who is:
(1) Less than six (6) months of age at the time the petition for
adoption is filed; and
(2) Not in the custody of the Department of Human Services.

/s/Bentley


















02-13-2025 10:34:48 LJH058